Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.15.794

Effective communication—Implementation of principles.

The governing board of each state university, regional university, state college, and community college shall ensure that the principles in *section 1 of this act are implemented at its institution of higher education.

[ 1991 c 228 s 3.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: A translation of "section 1 of this act" is RCW 28B.15.790. RCW 28B.15.792 was apparently intended.